Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.130

Executory contracts and unexpired leases.

(1) A general receiver may assume or reject any executory contract or unexpired lease of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed upon order of the court following notice to the other party to the contract or lease upon notice and a hearing. The court may condition assumption or rejection of any executory contract or unexpired lease on the terms and conditions the court believes are just and proper under the particular circumstances of the case. A general receiver's performance of an executory contract or unexpired lease prior to the court's authorization of its assumption or rejection shall not constitute an assumption of the contract or lease, or an agreement by the receiver to assume it, nor otherwise preclude the receiver thereafter from seeking the court's authority to reject it.

(2) Any obligation or liability incurred by a general receiver on account of the receiver's assumption of an executory contract or unexpired lease shall be treated as an expense of the receivership. A general receiver's rejection of an executory contract or unexpired lease shall be treated as a breach of the contract or lease occurring immediately prior to the receiver's appointment; and the receiver's right to possess or use property pursuant to any executory contract or lease shall terminate upon rejection of the contract or lease. The other party to an executory contract or unexpired lease that is rejected by a general receiver may take such steps as may be necessary under applicable law to terminate or cancel the contract or lease. The claim of a party to an executory contract or unexpired lease resulting from a general receiver's rejection of it shall be served upon the receiver in the manner provided for by RCW 7.60.210 within thirty days following the rejection.

(3) A general receiver's power under this section to assume an executory contract or unexpired lease shall not be affected by any provision in the contract or lease that would effect or permit a forfeiture, modification, or termination of it on account of either the receiver's appointment, the financial condition of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed, or an assignment for the benefit of creditors by that person.

(4) A general receiver may not assume an executory contract or unexpired lease of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed without the consent of the other party to the contract or lease if:

(a) Applicable law would excuse a party, other than the person over whose property the receiver is appointed, from accepting performance from or rendering performance to anyone other than the person even in the absence of any provisions in the contract or lease expressly restricting or prohibiting an assignment of the person's rights or the performance of the person's duties;

(b) The contract or lease is a contract to make a loan or extend credit or financial accommodations to or for the benefit of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed, or to issue a security of the person; or

(c) The executory contract or lease expires by its own terms, or under applicable law prior to the receiver's assumption thereof.

(5) A receiver may not assign an executory contract or unexpired lease without assuming it, absent the consent of the other parties to the contract or lease.

(6) If the receiver rejects an executory contract or unexpired lease for:

(a) The sale of real property under which the person over whose property the receiver is appointed is the seller and the purchaser is in possession of the real property;

(b) The sale of a real property timeshare interest under which the person over whose property the receiver is appointed is the seller;

(c) The license of intellectual property rights under which the person over whose property the receiver is appointed is the licensor; or

(d) The lease of real property in which the person over whose property the receiver is appointed is the lessor;

then the purchaser, licensee, or lessee may treat the rejection as a termination of the contract, license agreement, or lease, or alternatively, the purchaser, licensee, or lessee may remain in possession in which case the purchaser, licensee, or lessee shall continue to perform all obligations arising thereunder as and when they may fall due, but may offset against any payments any damages occurring on account of the rejection after it occurs. The purchaser of real property in such a case is entitled to receive from the receiver any deed or any other instrument of conveyance which the person over whose property the receiver is appointed is obligated to deliver under the executory contract when the purchaser becomes entitled to receive it, and the deed or instrument has the same force and effect as if given by the person. A purchaser, licensee, or lessee who elects to remain in possession under the terms of this subsection has no rights against the receiver on account of any damages arising from the receiver's rejection except as expressly provided for by this subsection. A purchaser of real property who elects to treat rejection of an executory contract as a termination has a lien against the interest in that real property of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed for the recovery of any portion of the purchase price that the purchaser has paid.

(7) Any contract with the state shall be deemed rejected if not assumed within sixty days of appointment of a general receiver unless the receiver and state agency agree to its assumption or as otherwise ordered by the court for good cause shown.

(8) Nothing in this chapter affects the enforceability of antiassignment prohibitions provided under contract or applicable law.

[ 2011 c 34 s 5; 2004 c 165 s 15.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.